Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4940.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 21502. As used in this part:
(a) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority
as provided for in section 21525.
(b) "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly
through 1 or more intermediaries, controls the person specified.
(c) "Approved claim" means a claim that is approved pursuant
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


to under section 21510.
(d) "Authority" means the underground storage tank authority
created in section 21523.
(e) "Board of directors" or "board" means the board of
directors of the authority.
(f) "Bond proceeds account" means the account within the fund
to which proceeds of bonds or notes issued under this part have
been credited.
(g) "Bonds or notes" means the bonds, notes, commercial paper,
other obligations of indebtedness, or any combination of these,
issued by the finance authority pursuant to in accordance with this
part.
(h) "Bulk transfer" means a transfer of refined petroleum or a
refined petroleum product from, or purchase for resale by, a
refiner, pipeline terminal operator, supplier, or marine terminal
operator to or from another refiner, pipeline terminal operator,
supplier, or marine terminal operator through pipeline tender or
marine delivery, including pipeline movements of refined petroleum
or a refined petroleum product from 1 or more marine vessel
movements of refined petroleum or a refined petroleum product.
Refined petroleum or a refined petroleum product in a refinery,
pipeline, terminal, or marine vessel transporting refined petroleum
or a refined petroleum product to a refinery or terminal is in the
bulk transfer terminal system. Notwithstanding anything to the
contrary in this subdivision, refined petroleum or a refined
petroleum product transferred or purchased for resale by a refiner,
pipeline terminal operator, supplier, or marine terminal operator
must be delivered to or otherwise remain within the bulk transfer
terminal system prior to before removal across the rack in order to
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


constitute a bulk transfer.
(i) "Bulk transfer terminal system" means the refined
petroleum or refined petroleum product distribution system
consisting of refineries, pipelines, marine vessels, and terminals
and includes refined petroleum or refined petroleum product storage
tanks and refined petroleum or refined petroleum product storage
facilities that are part of a refinery, boat terminal transfer, or
terminal owned, operated, or controlled by a refiner, marine
terminal operator, or pipeline terminal operator.
(j) "Claim" means the submission by the owner or operator or
his the owner's or her operator's representative of documentation
on an application requesting payment by the authority. A claim
shall must include, at a minimum, a completed and signed claim form
and the name, address, and telephone number of the owner or
operator.
(k) "Claimant" means a person to whom an approved claim is
assigned or transferred.
(l) (k) "Claims "Claim limit" means $1,000,000.00 per release.
Two or more claims arising out of the same, interrelated,
associated, repeated, or continuous releases or a series of related
releases shall be subject to 1 claims limit. Any claim that takes
place over 2 or more claim periods shall be subject to 1 claims
limit.claim, minus the appropriate deductible amount under section
21510a.
(m) (l) "Claim period" means a 1-year period commencing on
beginning October 1 of each year and ending on September 30 the
following year.
(n) (m) "Claim period aggregate limit" means the following
aggregate claims limit for all releases discovered during
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


$2,000,000.00 for a claimant or a claimant's affiliate for all
claims approved for a claim period. :
(i) For owners, operators, and affiliates of 1 to 100 refined
petroleum underground storage tanks, $1,000,000.00.
(ii) For owners, operators, and affiliates of more than 100
refined petroleum underground storage tanks, $2,000,000.00.
(o) "Closure" means department-approved closure of a release
covered by an approved claim. Closure includes approval of a
closure report with conditions after the conditions are met.
(p) "Confirmed release" means a release of refined petroleum
that is reported to the department of licensing and regulatory
affairs on a form created by the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs and designated on the form as a confirmed
release.
(q) (n) "Controls" means the possession or the contingent or
noncontingent right to acquire possession, direct or indirect, of
the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and
policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting
securities or interests, by contract, other than a commercial
contract for goods or nonmanagement services, by pledge of
securities, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an
official position with or corporate office held by the person.
(r) (o) "Corrective action" means that term as it is defined
in section 21302.
(s) (p) "Deductible amount" means the amount of corrective
action costs or indemnification costs that are required to be paid
by an owner or operator a claimant as provided in section 21510a.
(t) (q) "Department" means the department of environmental
quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy.
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


(u) (r) "Eligible person" means an owner or operator who meets
the eligibility requirements under this part to submit a claim.
(v) (s) "Excluded liquid" means that term as defined in 26 CFR
48.4081-1.
(w) "Federally recognized tribe" means a Native American
tribal entity that is recognized as having a government-to-
government relationship with the United States, that has the
responsibilities, powers, limitations, and obligations attached to
that designation, and that is eligible for funding and services
from the federal government.
(x) (t) "Finance authority" means the Michigan finance
authority created by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL
12.194.
(y) (u) "Financial responsibility requirements" means the
financial responsibility for taking corrective action and for
compensating third parties for bodily injury and property damage
caused by a release from a refined petroleum underground storage
tank system that the owner or operator of a refined petroleum
underground storage tank system must demonstrate under part 211 and
the rules promulgated under that part.
(z) (v) "Fund" means the underground storage tank cleanup fund
created in section 21506b and includes the bond proceeds account
established within the fund.
(aa) (w) "Indemnification" means indemnification of an owner
or operator a claimant for a legally enforceable judgment entered
against the owner or operator claimant by a third party, or a
legally enforceable settlement entered between the owner or
operator claimant and a third party, compensating that third party
for bodily injury or property damage, or both, caused by an
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


accidental release. as As used in this subdivision, "accidental
release", "bodily injury", and "property damage" mean those terms
are as defined in R 29.2163 of the Michigan Administrative Code.
(bb) (x) "Location" means a parcel of property where refined
petroleum underground storage tank systems are registered pursuant
to in accordance with part 211.
(cc) (y) "Marine terminal operator" means a person that stores
refined petroleum or a refined petroleum product at a boat terminal
transfer.
(dd) (z) "Operator" means that term as it is defined in
section 21303 or a person to whom an approved claim has been
assigned or transferred.
(ee) (aa) "Owner" means that term as it is defined in section
21303.
(ff) (bb) "Oxygenate" means an organic compound containing
that contains oxygen and having has properties as a fuel that are
compatible with petroleum, including, but not limited to, ethanol,
methanol, or methyl tertiary butyl ether (MTBE).
Sec. 21503. As used in this part:
(a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental entity, or other legal entity.
(b) "Pipeline terminal operator" means a person that receives
and stores refined petroleum or a refined petroleum product in
tanks and other equipment used in receiving and storing refined
petroleum or a refined petroleum product from interstate and
intrastate pipelines, pending wholesale bulk reshipment.
(c) "Qualifying expenditures" means an expenditure for a
specific activity that does not exceed the allowable payment for
that activity as detailed on the schedule of costs.
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


(c) (d) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering refined
petroleum or a refined petroleum product from a refiner, a pipeline
terminal operator, or a marine terminal operator into a railroad
tank car, a transport truck, a tank wagon, or the fuel supply tank
of a marine vessel.
(d) (e) "Refined petroleum" means aviation gasoline, middle
distillates, jet fuel, kerosene, gasoline, residual oils, and any
oxygenates that have been blended with any of these. Refined
petroleum includes refined petroleum products and transmix. Refined
petroleum does not include excluded liquids.
(e) (f) "Refined petroleum fund" means the refined petroleum
fund established under section 21506a.
(f) (g) "Refined petroleum underground storage tank" means an
underground storage tank system used for the storage of refined
petroleum.
(g) (h) "Refiner" means a person that meets both of the
following:
(i) Manufactures or produces refined petroleum or a refined
petroleum product at a refinery.
(ii) Is a taxable fuel registrant that is a refiner for
purposes of 26 CFR 48.4081-1.
(h) (i) "Refinery" means a facility used by a refiner to
produce refined petroleum or a refined petroleum product from crude
oil, unfinished oils, natural gas liquids, or other hydrocarbons by
any process involving substantially more than the blending of
refined petroleum and from which refined petroleum or a refined
petroleum product may be removed by pipeline or marine vessel or at
a rack.
(i) (j) "Regulated financial institution" means a state or
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


nationally chartered bank, savings and loan association or savings
bank, credit union, or other state or federally chartered lending
institution or a regulated affiliate or regulated subsidiary of any
of these entities.
(j) (k) "Regulatory fee" means the environmental protection
regulatory fee imposed under section 21508.
(k) (l) "Release" means that term as it is defined in section
21303.
(l) (m) "Removal" or "removed" means a physical transfer other
than by evaporation, loss, or destruction of refined petroleum or a
refined petroleum product from a refiner, pipeline terminal
operator, or marine terminal operator.
(m) (n) "Schedule of costs" means the list of allowable
reimbursement amounts that may be paid on a claim, as established
in section 21510b.
(n) (o) "Site" means that term as it is defined in section
21303.
(o) (p) "Supplier" means a supplier or permissive supplier
licensed under the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to
207.1170.
(p) (q) "Tank wagon" means a straight truck having 1 or more
compartments other than the fuel supply tank designed or used to
carry fuel.
(q) (r) "Terminal" means a refined petroleum or refined
petroleum products storage and distribution facility that meets all
of the following requirements:
(i) Is registered as a qualified terminal by the internal
revenue service.Internal Revenue Service.
(ii) Is supplied by a pipeline or a marine vessel.
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


(iii) Has a rack from which refined petroleum or refined
petroleum products may be removed.
(r) (s) "Transmix" means the mixed product that results from
the buffer or interface of 2 different products in a pipeline
shipment, or a mixture of 2 different products within a refinery or
terminal that results in an off-grade mixture.
(s) (t) "Transport truck" means a semitrailer combination rig
designed or used for the purpose of transporting refined petroleum
or a refined petroleum product over the public roads or highways.
(t) (u) "Two-party exchange" means a transaction, including a
book transfer, in which refined petroleum or a refined petroleum
product is transferred from 1 supplier to another supplier and to
which all of the following apply:
(i) The transaction includes a transfer of refined petroleum or
a refined petroleum product from the person that holds the original
inventory position for the refined petroleum or refined petroleum
product in storage tanks as reflected in the records of the
refiner, pipeline terminal operator, or marine terminal operator.
(ii) The exchange transaction is completed before removal
across the rack by the receiving supplier.
(iii) The refiner, pipeline terminal operator, or marine
terminal operator in its books and records treats the receiving
exchange party as the supplier that removes the refined petroleum
or refined petroleum product across a rack for purposes of
reporting the transaction to the department under the motor fuel
tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to 207.1170.
(u) (v) "Underground storage tank system" means that term as
it is defined in section 21303.
(v) (w) "Work invoice" means a list of goods or services for
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


costs of corrective action related to a claim, including a
statement of the amount due.
Sec. 21506a. (1) The refined petroleum fund is created within
the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the refined petroleum fund. The state
treasurer shall direct the investment of the refined petroleum fund
. The state treasurer shall and credit to the refined petroleum
fund interest and earnings from refined petroleum fund investments.
(3) Money in the refined petroleum fund at the close of the
fiscal year remains in the refined petroleum fund and does not
lapse to the general fund.
(4) Money from the refined petroleum fund shall must be
expended, upon on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the
following purposes:
(a) Corrective actions performed by the department pursuant to
in accordance with section 21320.
(b) The legacy release program created in section 21519a.
(c) The reasonable costs of the department in administering
the refined petroleum fund and implementing part 213.
(d) Not more than $5,000,000.00 annually for petroleum product
inspection programs under both of the following:
(i) The weights and measures act, 1964 PA 283, MCL 290.601 to
290.635.
(ii) The motor fuels quality act, 1984 PA 44, MCL 290.641 to
290.650d.
(e) Not more than $3,000,000.00 annually for the bureau of
fire services and office of the state fire marshal, storage tank
division, section, in the department of licensing and regulatory
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


affairs.
(f) Reimbursement by the authority to local units of
government and county road commissions for the costs of corrective
action to manage, relocate, or dispose of any media contaminated by
regulated substances refined petroleum left in place within a
public highway pursuant to section 21310a if all of the following
occur:
(i) The local unit of government or county road commission has
submitted to the authority a public highway cleanup claim for
reimbursement on a form created by the authority.
(ii) The public highway cleanup claim for reimbursement is for
reasonable and necessary eligible corrective action costs
determined by the administrator pursuant to in accordance with
section 21515(2) to (10).(11).
(iii) The amount of reimbursement is not more than $200,000.00
per claim.
(iv) An institutional control addressing impacted media within
the public highway in accordance with section 21310a must be in
place before initiation of corrective actions and the submission of
a public highway cleanup claim. The department may determine, in
writing, that an institutional control is not necessary under this
subparagraph.
(v) The public highway cleanup claim is for corrective actions
completed after January 24, 2018.
(g) Not more than $5,000,000.00 annually for the department to
provide grants and loans in accordance with part 196 to facilitate
brownfield redevelopment at part 213 properties. Money shall must
not be provided under this subsection to fund the performance of
response activities at a part 213 property to address contamination
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


that is solely attributable to a release regulated under part 201.
(h) The permanent closure of an underground storage tank
system by the department if the underground storage tank system
meets the conditions that require permanent closure under R 29.2153
of the Michigan Administrative Code or the department determines it
is necessary to protect public health, safety, welfare, or the
environment.
Sec. 21510. (1) An owner or operator is eligible to receive
money from the authority for corrective action or indemnification
due to a confirmed release from a refined petroleum underground
storage tank system only if all of the following requirements are
satisfied and the owner or operator otherwise complies with this
part:
(a) The release from which the corrective action or
indemnification arose was discovered and reported on or after
December 30, 2014.
(b) The refined petroleum underground storage tank from which
the release occurred was, at the time of discovery of the release ,
and is presently, in compliance with the registration and fee
requirements of part 211. The refined petroleum underground storage
tank owned by a federally recognized tribe from which the release
occurred was, at the time of discovery of the release, in
compliance with federal registration and fee requirements.
(c) The owner or operator reported the confirmed release
within not later than 24 hours after its discovery as required by
part 211 and the rules promulgated under that part.of the confirmed
release.
(d) The owner or operator is not the United States government.
(e) The claim is not for a release from a refined petroleum
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


underground storage tank closed prior to before January 1, 1974, in
compliance with the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1 to
29.33, and the rules promulgated under that act.
(f) The owner or operator was in compliance with the financial
responsibility requirements of part 211 and the rules promulgated
under that part at the time of the discovery of the release or
releases for which the claim is filed. An underground storage tank
owned by a federally recognized tribe was in compliance with
federal financial responsibility requirements at the time of the
discovery of the release. The financial responsibility requirements
may be waived for previously unknown refined petroleum underground
storage tanks with written consent from the administrator.
(g) The owner or operator is otherwise eligible to receive
money from the authority under this part.
(h) The total amount of expenditures, including the deductible
amount, does not exceed the claims limit or the claim period
aggregate limit applicable to the claim.The claim is filed not
later than 24 months after the date the confirmed release is
reported.
(i) The claim is not for a release discovered after a refined
petroleum underground storage tank system from which the release
occurred was closed or considered permanently closed in compliance
with part 211 and the rules promulgated under that part.
(j) The owner or operator is otherwise in compliance with this
part.
(k) The administrator and the board may consider substantial
compliance when making eligibility determinations under this
subsection.
(2) The owner or operator may receive money from the authority
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


for corrective action or indemnification due to a release that
originates from an aboveground piping and dispensing portion of a
refined petroleum underground storage tank system if all of the
following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The owner or operator is otherwise in compliance with this
part and the rules promulgated under this part.
(b) The release is sudden and immediate.
(c) The release is of a quantity exceeding 25 gallons and is
released into groundwater, surface water, or soils.
(d) The owner or operator reported the release to the
department within 24 hours after its discovery.
(2) (3) Either the owner or the operator may receive money
from the authority under this part for an occurrence, but not both.
(3) (4) An owner or operator that is a public utility with
more than 500,000 customers in this state is ineligible to receive
money from the authority for corrective action or indemnification
associated with a release from a refined petroleum underground
storage tank system used to supply refined petroleum for the
generation of steam electricity.
(5) If an owner or operator has received money from the
authority under this part for a release at a location, the owner
and operator are not eligible to receive money from the authority
for a subsequent release at the same location unless the owner or
operator has done either or both of the following:
(a) Discovered the subsequent release pursuant to corrective
action being taken on a confirmed release and included this
subsequent release as part of the corrective action for the
confirmed release.
(b) Upgraded, replaced, removed, or properly closed in place
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


all refined petroleum underground storage tank systems at the
location of the release so as to meet the requirements of part 211
and the rules promulgated under that part.
(6) An owner or operator that discovers a subsequent release
at the same location as an initial release pursuant to subsection
(5)(a) may receive money from the authority to perform corrective
action on the subsequent release, if the owner or operator
otherwise complies with the requirements of this part and the rules
promulgated under this part. However, the subsequent release shall
be considered as part of the claim for the initial release for
purposes of determining the total amount of expenditures for
corrective action and indemnification under subsection (1)(h).
(7) An owner or operator that discovers a subsequent release
at the same location as an initial release following compliance
with subsection (5)(b) may receive money from the authority to
perform corrective action on the subsequent release, if there have
been not more than 2 releases at the location, and if the owner or
operator otherwise complies with the requirements of this part and
the rules promulgated under this part. The subsequent release shall
be considered a separate claim for purposes of determining the
total amount of expenditures for corrective action and
indemnification under subsection (1)(h).
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), each
eligible confirmed release must be covered by an additional claim
and is subject to the appropriate deductible amount under section
21510a.
(5) A confirmed release must be covered by the most recently
approved claim and is subject to that claim's claim limit and claim
period aggregate limit if all of the following apply:
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


(a) The administrator determines, or the owner or operator
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the administrator, that 2 or
more confirmed releases are the result of a continuing or repeated
exposure from an initial eligible confirmed release.
(b) The releases described under subdivision (a) are
discovered during the same claim period.
(c) The releases described under subdivision (a) are not
interrupted or replaced by a separate cause.
(6) Expenses related to corrective actions taken to address a
confirmed release and that are part of an approved claim are
eligible for reimbursement and are subject to that approved claim's
claim limit and claim period aggregate limit. Expenses related to
corrective actions taken to address a confirmed release that are
not included as part of an approved claim are not eligible for
reimbursement.
(7) (8) An owner or operator that seeks to receive money from
the authority for corrective action related to a release shall
submit to the administrator the cleanup fund claim submittal form
created by the authority containing that contains the information
required by the administrator to determine compliance with this
part. The administrator shall determine whether the claim complies
with this part and shall notify the owner or operator. The
administrator may consult with the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs to make the determination required in this
subsection.
(8) The authority shall not approve a claim for any of the
following:
(a) A release that was expected or intended by an owner or
operator or an employee of an owner or operator.
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75


(b) A release caused by, based on, resulting from, or
attributable to the owner's or operator's intentional, knowing,
willful, or deliberate noncompliance with a statute, regulation,
ordinance, administrative complaint, notice of violation, notice
letter, executive order, or instruction of any governmental agency
or body.
(c) A release arising from the ownership, maintenance, use, or
entrustment to others of an aircraft, an automobile, rolling stock,
or a watercraft, including loading and unloading.
(d) A release arising from a consequence, whether direct or
indirect, of war, invasion, act of a foreign enemy, act of
terrorists, hostilities, whether war has been declared or not,
civil war, rebellion, revolution, insurrection, usurpation of
power, strike, riot, or civil commotion.
Enacting section 1. Section 21510c of the natural resources
and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.21510c, is
repealed.
Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5115 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
RMH H01705'25 (H-3) hq9j75